Rhode Island statutes. Title 2 Agriculture and Forestry
Chapter 14 Tree Wardens

2-14-1.
“Tree warden” defined.

Wherever in this chapter the term “tree warden” is used, it means the tree warden appointed by any town or city as provided in §§

2-14-2

and

2-14-3

.

History of Section. P.L. 1931, ch. 1763, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 225, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

2-14-1

.

2-14-2.
Appointment by town council or city mayor.

Every town council at its regular meeting in January of each year, and the mayor of every city on or before February 1 each year, shall appoint a tree warden who is, or who within six (6) months of his or her assuming office, becomes an arborist, licensed
under chapter 19 of this title, to engage in the business or practice of all phases of tree care, including, but without limiting the generality to the planting, pruning, trimming, spraying, or repairing of fruit, shade, forest and
ornamental trees and shrubs.

History of Section. P.L. 1931, ch. 1763, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 225, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

2-14-2

; P.L. 1962, ch. 150, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 173, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 259, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 317, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 78, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 450, § 1.

2-14-3.
Term of office — Vacancies.

A tree warden whose appointment is approved by the director of environmental management holds office until the first day of March in the year following his or her appointment and until his or her successor is appointed and approved as provided in §

2-14-2

. Any vacancy that may occur in the office of the tree warden of any city or town, from any cause, shall be filled by the town council of the town or by the mayor of any city, as the case may be, by the appointment of
some person to serve as tree warden for the remainder of the term, and the appointment is subject to the approval of the director. If the town council of any town, or the mayor of any city, fails within sixty (60) days to appoint a
tree warden as required by §

2-14-2

and this section, the director shall appoint some resident of the town or city to act as tree warden until an appointment is made by the town council or the mayor, as the case may be, and approved by the director as provided
in § 2-14-2.

History of Section. P.L. 1931, ch. 1763, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 225, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

2-14-3

.

2-14-4.
Deputies — Compensation of warden and deputies.

A tree warden may appoint any number of deputy tree wardens that he or she deems expedient and may at any time remove them from office. The tree warden and his or her deputies shall receive any compensation for their services that the town or city council
may determine.

History of Section. P.L. 1931, ch. 1763, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 225, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

2-14-4

.

2-14-5.
Trees under control of warden — Entry on private property.

The tree warden in a town or city has the care and control of all trees and shrubs, in whole or in part within the limits of any public road or grounds and within the limits of his or her town or city, except those on roads under the control of the department
of transportation and those in public parks or grounds which are under the jurisdiction and control of the department of environmental management or the park commission of any town or city. The tree warden may assume the care and control
of trees or shrubs in any public park if requested, in writing, by the department of environmental management or the park commission of any city or town. The care and control extends to any limbs, roots or parts of trees and shrubs
that extend or overhang the limits or bounds of any public road or grounds, and the tree warden, or his or her agent, or an authorized agent of the department of transportation, or an authorized agent of the department of environmental
management, or an authorized agent of the park commission of any town or city, may enter upon private property when necessary to exercise care and control.

History of Section. P.L. 1931, ch. 1763, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 225, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, §§ 2, 4; G.L. 1956, §

2-14-5

.

2-14-6.
Town or city forest areas — Supervision by department of environmental management.

The tree warden has charge of and is responsible for the management of all town or city forest areas, including the setting out of trees and the care and protection of the trees, except those areas specifically exempted in §

2-14-5

. When the town or city council requests the department of environmental management to give general supervision over its town or city forests, the tree warden shall follow those recommendations and cooperate closely with
the department.

History of Section. P.L. 1931, ch. 1763, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 225, § 13; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

2-14-6

.

2-14-7.
Powers and duties of wardens.

The tree warden shall expend all sums which are appropriated for the setting out, care and maintenance of trees and shrubs on roads and public places under his or her control. He or she shall enforce all provisions of law for the preservation of those
trees and shrubs and may make suitable regulations governing the care and preservation of those trees and shrubs as he or she may deem expedient, and those regulations are subject to the approval of the town or city council.

History of Section. P.L. 1931, ch. 1763, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 225, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

2-14-7

.

2-14-8.
Removal and pruning of trees.

Whenever, in the opinion of the tree warden, it is necessary to remove or prune any tree or shrub under his or her control, he or she may cause the tree or shrub to be removed or pruned at the expense of the town or city, and the town council or city
council shall order paid to the person performing the work any reasonable compensation that may be determined and approved, in writing, by the tree warden. Unless the condition of the tree constitutes an immediate public hazard, he
or she shall, at least five (5) days before the removal, post in the immediate vicinity a suitable notice stating his or her intention to remove the tree. If any person, firm or corporation objects to the removal, he or she or it may
appeal to the tree warden, in writing, who shall hold a public hearing at some suitable time and place after giving reasonable notice of the hearing to all persons known to be interested and posting a suitable notice in the immediate
vicinity. Within three (3) days after the hearing, the tree warden shall render his or her decision granting or denying the appeal. The department of transportation, the department of environmental management, and the park commission
of any town or city have the right to remove or prune any tree or shrub at their own expense, but prior to the removal of any tree shall post a suitable notice in the immediate vicinity of the tree and, if requested, hold a public
hearing and either grant or deny the appeal.

History of Section. P.L. 1931, ch. 1763, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 225, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, §§ 2, 4; G.L. 1956, §

2-14-8

.

2-14-9.
Suppression of pests and diseases.

In any case where the town or city council requests the department of environmental management to give general supervision over its town or city forest in the suppression of insect pests and tree diseases, the tree warden shall follow those recommendations
and cooperate closely with the department of environmental management.

History of Section. P.L. 1931, ch. 1763, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 225, § 14; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

2-14-9

.

2-14-10.
Local appropriations.

Each town or city may appropriate annually sums of money to be expended by the tree warden of a town or city in the planting, trimming, spraying, care, and preservation of shrubs or ornamental or shade trees within the limits of any public highway or
grounds under his or her control and, at the discretion of the tree warden with the written consent of the owner, upon land adjoining any public highway or grounds, if not more than twenty (20) feet from the highway or grounds, for
the purpose of shading or ornamenting highway or grounds.

History of Section. P.L. 1931, ch. 1763, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 225, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

2-14-10

; P.L. 2006, ch. 564, § 1.

2-14-11.
Application to Providence.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the city of Providence, and this chapter shall in no way affect the provisions of chapter 1479 of the public laws, 1907, entitled “An act providing for the care and preservation of shade trees, and for
other purposes, in the city of Providence,” as amended by chapter 693 of the public laws, 1925. The appointment of a tree warden for the city of Providence is approved by the director of environmental management, as provided in §

2-14-2

.

History of Section. P.L. 1931, ch. 1763, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 225, § 15; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2973, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

2-14-11

.

2-14-12.
Application to West Greenwich.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the tree warden of the town of West Greenwich who was appointed prior to July 1, 1986 and has served continuously as the tree warden since that date.

History of Section.
P.L. 1999, ch. 208, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 328, § 1.